Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 3. Superintendent of Public Instruction.

§ 22.1-21.
Appointment and qualification.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be appointed by the Governor, after consultation with the Board of Education among others, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, for a term coincident with that of the Governor making the appointment. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be an experienced educator.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-22; 1977, c. 542; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 6.

As to the power of the Governor to appoint the administrative heads of agencies, see §

2.2-106

.

§ 22.1-22.
Oath of office.

Before entering upon the duties of his office, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed for an officer of this Commonwealth as provided in Chapter 1 (§

49-1

et seq.) of Title 49.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-24; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-23.
Duties in general.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:

Serve as secretary of the Board of Education;

Provide such assistance in his office as shall be necessary for the proper and uniform enforcement of the provisions of the school laws in cooperation with the local school authorities;

Prepare and furnish such forms for attendance officers, teachers and other school officials as are required by law;

(Expires July 1, 2025) At least annually, survey all local school divisions to identify critical shortages of (i) teachers and administrative personnel by geographic area, by school division, or by subject matter and (ii) school bus drivers by geographic area and local school division and report such critical shortages to each local school division and to the Virginia Retirement System;

Develop and provide to local school divisions a model exit questionnaire for teachers;

Along with the State Health Commissioner, work to combat childhood obesity and other chronic health conditions that affect school-age children;

Designate an employee of the Department of Education to serve as its liaison to the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia and the State Board for Community Colleges; and

Perform such other duties as the Board of Education may prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-25, 22-26, 22-28; 1980, c. 559; 2001, cc. 689, 700; 2007, cc. 43, 55; 2015, c. 140; 2016, c. 594; 2020, cc. 379, 437.

Cross references.

For constitutional authority of General Assembly to prescribe powers and duties, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 6.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 689 and 700, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2003, c. 211, Acts 2005, c. 609, Acts 2009, c. 590, Acts 2015, c. 326, and Acts 2019, c. 765 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2025.” Subdivision 4 has been set out with a July 1, 2025, expiration date.

Acts 2005, cc. 605 and 606, also amended Acts 2001, cc. 689 and 700, cl. 5, providing for a July 1, 2007, expiration date. Subdivision 4 has been set out with a July 1, 2025, expiration date.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 689 and 700, effective March 26, 2001, are identical, and added subdivision 4, and renumbered former subdivision 4 as subdivision 5. For expiration of this amendment, see Editor’s note.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 43 and 55 are identical, and added present subdivision 5; redesignated former subdivision 5 as present subdivision 6; and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 140 added subdivision 6 and made related changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 594 added subdivision 5, and renumbered subsequent subdivisions accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 379 and 437 are identical, and in subdivision 4, inserted “and (ii) school bus drivers by geographic area and local school division” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 22.1-23.1.
Model exit questionnaire for teachers.

The Department shall develop and oversee a pilot program to administer across five geographically and demographically diverse school divisions the model exit questionnaire for teachers developed by the Superintendent pursuant to § 22.1-23, analyze the results of each such questionnaire, and include such results and analysis in the Superintendent’s annual report. The Department shall (i) administer such questionnaire to each teacher who ceases to be employed by the relevant school board for any reason and (ii) collect, maintain, and report on the results of each such questionnaire in a manner that ensures the confidentiality of each teacher’s name and other personally identifying information.

History.

2017, cc. 234, 308; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 234 and 308 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in the first sentence, deleted “of Education (the Department)” following “The Department,” “of Public Instruction (the Superintendent)” following “by the Superintendent,” and “beginning in 2018” at the end.

§ 22.1-23.2.
Consolidation of surveys, etc.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall identify any survey, questionnaire, inquiry, or other communication that requires a response from a school board or division superintendent as required by this title, Board regulations, the Superintendent, the Department, or other state agencies and shall, in collaboration with any identified requesting entity, work to consolidate, as much as practicable, all such surveys, questionnaires, inquiries, and other communications in order to reduce the administrative burden of such response.

History.

2019, c. 768.

§ 22.1-23.3.
Treatment of transgender students; policies.

The Department of Education shall develop and make available to each school board model policies concerning the treatment of transgender students in public elementary and secondary schools that address common issues regarding transgender students in accordance with evidence-based best practices and include information, guidance, procedures, and standards relating to:

Compliance with applicable nondiscrimination laws;

Maintenance of a safe and supportive learning environment free from discrimination and harassment for all students;

Prevention of and response to bullying and harassment;

Maintenance of student records;

Identification of students;

Protection of student privacy and the confidentiality of sensitive information;

Enforcement of sex-based dress codes; and

Student participation in sex-specific school activities and events and use of school facilities. Activities and events do not include athletics.

Each school board shall adopt policies that are consistent with but may be more comprehensive than the model policies developed by the Department of Education pursuant to subsection A.

History.

2020, cc. 153, 154.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 153 and
154, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education shall develop and make available to each school board model policies pursuant to subsection A of
§ 22.1-23.3 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than December 31, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 153 and
154, cl. 3 provides: “That each school board shall adopt policies pursuant to subsection B of
§ 22.1-23.3 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than the beginning of the 2021-2022 school year.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Guidance document. —

Model policies were a guidance document because they were developed by the Virginia Department of Education to provide information and guidance of general applicability to the various local school boards to interpret or implement the statute.
Christian Action Network v. Qarni, 108 Va. Cir. 313, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 164 (Lynchburg July 27, 2021).

§ 22.1-24.
Administration of “National School Lunch Act.”

The Superintendent of Public Instruction is hereby designated as the “State Educational Agency” for the disbursement of funds received by the Commonwealth of Virginia under the provisions of Public Law 396, 79th Congress, known as the “National School Lunch Act” and any successor act or amendment thereto; and as such is authorized, empowered and directed to exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred and imposed by such act of Congress.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-27; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-24.1.
(Effective until July 2, 2024) Internet Safety Advisory Council.

The Superintendent shall establish and appoint members to the Internet Safety Advisory Council (the Council) for the purpose of advancing the goal of safe use of media and technology by students and teachers in public elementary and secondary schools in the Commonwealth.

The membership of the Council shall include at least one (i) teacher; (ii) librarian; (iii) representative of a parent-teacher organization who is a parent of a school-age child; (iv) school administrator; (v) student; and (vi) individual with expertise in Internet safety and such other individuals as the Superintendent deems appropriate, provided that the membership of the Council shall not exceed 12.

The Council shall:

Develop and recommend to the Board for adoption, after study and consideration of a variety of sources and perspectives, a model policy for local school boards in the Commonwealth that would enable such school boards to better support the Internet safety of all students and teachers in the local school division;

Develop and recommend to the Board for adoption model instructional practices for the safe use of media and technology by students and teachers in public elementary and secondary schools in the Commonwealth; and

Design and post on the Department’s website a page with links to successful instructional practices, curricula, and other teacher resources used in school divisions within and outside of the Commonwealth for the safe use of media and technology by students and teachers.

History.

2022, c. 776.

Editor’s note.

Act 2022, c. 776, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Act 2022, c. 776, cl. 3 provides: “That the Internet Safety Advisory Council established by this act shall submit a report of its findings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than October 31, 2023.”